Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.030

Filing of petition as approved by city.

Upon approval of the petition for election by the legislative body of the code city to which such territory is proposed to be annexed, the petition shall be filed with the legislative authority of the county in which such territory is located, along with a statement, in the form required by the city, of the provisions, if any there be, relating to assumption of the portion of the debt that the city requires to be assumed by the owners of property of the area proposed to be annexed, and/or the simultaneous adoption of a proposed zoning regulation for the area. A copy of the petition and the statement, if any, shall also be filed with the boundary review board as provided for in chapter 36.93 RCW or the county annexation review board established by RCW 35A.14.160, unless such proposed annexation is within the provisions of RCW 35A.14.220.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 6; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 124: See note following RCW 35A.14.015.